pt-PT: Estilo de quadro de bicicleta: Chopper stretch; Holandês/urbano; Klunker; Lowrider; Quadro em diamante (step-over); Quadro aberto (step-through); Outros
nl: Fiets frame stijl: Chopper-stretch; Stadsfiets; Klunker; Lowrider; Herenmodel (diamant); Lage instap; Anders
tr: Bisiklet kadrosu stili: Uzun chopper; Hollanda/Şehir; Klunker; Lowrider; Üstten binilen (Elmas); Açık kadro; Diğer
it: Stile Frame della bicicletta: Chopper stretch; Olandese/City bike; Klunker; Lowrider; A canna alta (a diamante); A canna bassa; Altro
ru: Стиль велосипедной рамы: Чоппер-стретч; Городская/голландская; Клункер; Лоурайдер; Закрытая (ромбовидная); Открытая; Другое
pl: Styl ramy rowerowej: Chopper stretch; Holenderski/miejski; Klunker; Lowrider; Z górną rurą (diament); Z obniżonym przekrokiem (step-through); Inne
hu: Kerékpár keretstílusa: Nyújtott chopper; Holland / városi; Klunker; Lowrider; Zárt váz (gyémánt); Nyitott váz; Egyéb
da: Type af cykelramme: Chopper-stretch; Hollandsk/Citybike; Klunker; Lowrider; Step-over (diamant); Lav indstigning; Andet
fi: Polkupyörän rungon malli: Chopper; Hollantilainen/kaupunki; Klunker; Lowrider; Vaakaputkinen (timantti); Läpiastuttava; Muu
zh-TW: 自行車架樣式: Chopper 加長型; 荷蘭/城市車; Klunker; 低底盤自行車; 高跨點 (鑽石型); 低跨點; 其他
ro-RO: Stilul cadrului bicicletei: Chopper stretch; Olandeză/De oraș; Klunker; Lowrider; Cadru înalt (Diamant); Cadru jos; Altele
lt-LT: Dviračio rėmo stilius: Prailgintas („Chopper“); Miesto / olandiškas; „Klunker“ tipo; „Lowrider“ tipo; Aukšto rėmo (deimantinis); Žemo rėmo; Kita
de: Stil des Fahrradrahmens: Chopper-Stretch; Hollandrad/Citybike; Klunker; Lowrider; Klassisch (Diamant); Tiefeinsteiger; Sonstige
es: Tipo de cuadro de bicicleta: Chopper extendida; Holandés/de ciudad; Klunker; Lowrider; Barra alta (diamante); Barra baja; Otro
sk-SK: Štýl rámu bicykla: Predĺžený chopper; Holandský/mestský; Klunker; Lowrider; S vysokým nástupom (diamantový); S nízkym nástupom; Iný
ko: 자전거 프레임 유형: 초퍼 스트레치; 더치/시티; 클렁커; 로우라이더; 스텝오버(다이아몬드); 스텝스루; 기타
en: Bicycle frame style: Chopper stretch; Dutch/City; Klunker; Lowrider; Step-over (Diamond); Step-through; Other
nb: Sykkelens rammestil: Chopper stretch; Nederlandsk / bysykkel; Klunker; Lowrider; Høy innstigning (diamant); Lav innstigning; Annet
th: รูปแบบเฟรมจักรยาน: ชอปเปอร์ยืดหน้า; ดัตช์/ซิตี้; คลังเกอร์; โลว์ไรเดอร์; สเตปโอเวอร์ (ไดมอนด์); สเตปทรู; อื่นๆ
ja: 自転車Frameスタイル: チョッパーストレッチ; ダッチ / シティ; クランカー; ローライダー; ステップオーバー (ダイヤモンド); ステップスルー; その他
fr: Style de cadre de vélo: Chopper allongé; Hollandais/de ville; Klunker; Lowrider; Enjambement haut (cadre diamant); Enjambement bas; Autre
vi: Kiểu khung xe đạp: Chopper kéo dài; Hà Lan/thành phố; Klunker; Lowrider; Gióng ngang (hình thoi); Khung võng; Khác
bg-BG: Стил на рамката на велосипеда: Чопър (удължена); Градска (холандска); Клункър; Лоурайдър; Със затворена рамка (диамантена); С отворена рамка (дамска); Други
pt-BR: Estilo do quadro da bicicleta: Chopper alongada; Holandesa/Urbana; Klunker; Lowrider; Step-over (diamante); Step-through; Outro
hr-HR: Stil okvira bicikla: Chopper stretch; Nizozemski/gradski; Klunker; Lowrider; Klasični (dijamantni); Otvoreni (s niskom gornjom cijevi); Ostalo
sl-SI: Slog okvirja kolesa: Chopper stretch; Nizozemski/mestni; Klunker; Lowrider; Klasični (diamantni); Z nizko cevjo; Drugo
sv: Cykelramstil: Chopper stretch; Holländsk/City; Klunker; Lowrider; Step-over (diamant); Lågt insteg; Övrigt
cs: Styl rámu jízdního kola: Prodloužený chopper; Holandský / městský; Klunker; Lowrider; Uzavřený (diamantový); S nízkým nástupem; Jiné
el: Στυλ πλαισίου ποδηλάτου: Chopper stretch; Ολλανδικό/Πόλης; Klunker; Lowrider; Step-over (Διαμάντι); Step-through; Άλλο
zh-CN: 自行车车架样式: 斩波加长; 荷兰/城市自行车; Klunker 越野车; 低底盘自行车; 高跨步式（菱形）; 低跨步式; 其他